Massachusetts, session 194th, H1181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 83. (a) A carrier, as defined in Section 1 of Chapter 176O of the General Laws,
shall pay an assessment to support expenses associated with health care costs covered by Chapter
118E of the general laws. Such assessment shall be based on the net worth surplus available to
health insurance carriers exceeding 550% of risk-based capital in calendar year 2023 in
accordance with criteria developed by the Division of Insurance, in consultation with the
executive office of health and human services. The executive office shall specify by regulation
the method of calculating the assessment, procedures for payment of the assessment, and
requirements for submission of data by health insurers.
of 3

(b) The executive office shall establish by regulation the mechanism for enforcing the
assessment liability under this section in the event that a carrier does not make a scheduled
payment, but the division may, for the purpose of administrative simplicity, establish threshold
liability amounts below which enforcement may be modified or waived. This enforcement
mechanism may include assessment of interest on the unpaid liability at a rate not to exceed an
annual percentage rate of 18 per cent and late fees or penalties at a rate not to exceed 5 per cent
per month.
(c) The amount of the assessment established by executive office in subsection (a) shall
be sufficient, in the aggregate, to generate $400,000,000.
(d) The executive office, in consultation with the comptroller and the secretary of
administration and finance, shall transfer $200,000,000 to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund
established in section 66 of Chapter 118E and $200,000,000 to the Medicaid Stabilization Trust
Fund established in section 2JJJJJJ of Chapter 29.
(e) Subsection (c) shall sunset on December 31, 2026.
Section 2. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the following
new section:-
Section 2JJJJJJJ. (a) There shall be a Medicaid Stabilization Trust Fund which shall be a
separate, nonbudgeted revenue fund to be administered by the secretary of health and human
services. There shall be credited to the fund: (i) any transfers by the executive office in
accordance with section 83 of chapter 118E (ii) an amount equal to any federal financial
participation revenues claimed and received by the commonwealth for eligible expenditures
made from the fund; (iii) any revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the
of 3

general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; and (iv) interest earned on
any money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further
appropriation, to prevent reductions in access to care for MassHealth beneficiaries and
reductions in reimbursement of healthcare services reimbursed by the program.
(b) Money in the fund shall be expended for Medicaid payments under an approved state
plan or federal waiver; provided, however, that all Medicaid payments from the fund shall be: (i)
subject to the availability of federal financial participation; (ii) made only under federally-
approved payment methods; and (iii) consistent with federal funding requirements and all
applicable federal payment limits as determined by the secretary. To accommodate timing
discrepancies between the receipt of revenue and related expenditures, the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimates as certified by the
secretary to be transferred, credited or deposited under this section. The secretary shall, to the
maximum extent possible, administer the fund to obtain federal financial participation for the
expenditures of non-federal money from the fund. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a
fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in
subsequent fiscal years.
Section 3. Section 66 of chapter 118E is hereby amended by adding the following words
subsection (b) after “money transferred from”:- “by the executive office in accordance with
section 83 of this chapter,”
of 3